New York, session 2025-2026, S8202.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Instruction in computer science. 1. Definitions. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms have the following mean- 5 ings: 6 a. "Computer science" means the study of computers and algorithmic 7 processes, including their principles, hardware and software designs, 8 implementation, and impact on society. 9 b. "Computer science course" means a course at the middle or high 10 school level that teaches computer science as a standalone implementa- 11 tion or, for middle school, embedded in other subjects. 12 2. Computer science graduation requirement. a. Students enrolled in 13 high school shall be required to complete one high school level computer 14 science course in order to receive a diploma of graduation from high 15 school. 16 b. The department shall adopt a list of approved computer science 17 courses no later than July first, two thousand twenty-eight, which shall 18 be made publicly available on the department's website. Such courses 19 shall include instruction on computer science, including teaching 20 students how to use existing technologies and how to create new technol- 21 ogies. Such courses shall meet or exceed the high school standards and 22 curriculum requirements established by the respective school district. 23 Such courses shall be taken in middle or high school grades to meet the 24 requirements of this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00897-01-5 S. 8202 2 1 c. A computer science course offered by a public high school or public 2 charter school shall be offered in an in-person setting; provided that 3 such course shall be offered as a virtual or distance course option only 4 when a traditional classroom setting is not feasible, as determined by 5 the respective school district. 6 d. The computer science courses required by this section may addi- 7 tionally fulfill existing graduation requirements for a school district, 8 as determined by the board of education of such school district. 9 e. Beginning July first, two thousand twenty-nine and on or before 10 each first of July thereafter, each school district shall submit to the 11 department a report for the prior academic year which shall include, but 12 not be limited to, the following: 13 (i) The names and course codes of computer science courses offered in 14 each school, including course descriptions and which state computer 15 science standards are covered, to the extent such information is avail- 16 able; and 17 (ii) The number of computer science instructors at each school, disag- 18 gregated by: 19 (A) certification, if applicable; 20 (B) gender; 21 (C) race and ethnicity; and 22 (D) highest academic degree. 23 f. The department shall post publicly on its website on or before July 24 first, two thousand thirty and on or before each first of July thereaft- 25 er the data received pursuant to paragraph e of this subdivision. The 26 data received pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of paragraph h of this 27 subdivision shall be disaggregated by school. The department shall 28 publish a list of computer science course codes and names, including 29 course descriptions and which courses align to the state computer 30 science standards under this section. 31 g. (i) Beginning July first, two thousand twenty-eight, a school 32 district may submit a signed notification to the department that certi- 33 fies a computer science course was not available for students enrolled 34 in such school district to fulfill the requirement of this section. If 35 such signed notification is submitted to the department, such require- 36 ment shall be waived for students enrolled in such school district. 37 (ii) The department shall maintain a list of the school districts that 38 submit signed notifications pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this para- 39 graph. 40 h. (i) Beginning July first, two thousand twenty-eight, a student may 41 submit a waiver, which shall be developed by the department, to the 42 school district in which such student is enrolled in the event that such 43 student is unable to complete the computer science course requirement 44 for graduation under this section. If such waiver is submitted to a 45 school district, such requirement shall be waived for the student that 46 submitted such waiver. Each school district shall submit all such waiv- 47 ers received from students to the department. 48 (ii) The department shall annually publish the number of students who 49 submit waivers pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. 50 3. State computer science supervisor position. The department shall 51 create a computer science supervisor position within the department. 52 Such computer science supervisor shall be appointed by the commissioner 53 and shall be responsible for effectuating the provisions of this section 54 within the department, including the development and implementation of 55 approved computer science education courses pursuant to this section. S. 8202 3 1 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 3004 of the education law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph c to read as follows: 3 c. The commissioner shall ensure that teacher preparation instructions 4 on and after July first, two thousand thirty, and any program of teacher 5 preparation leading to professional certification shall include instruc- 6 tion in computer science and instruction in information technology 7 skills as applied to student learning and classroom instruction that are 8 grade-level and subject area appropriate and that: 9 (i) clarify the conceptual foundations of computer science; 10 (ii) teach research-based practices, including hands-on and inquiry- 11 based learning; and 12 (iii) are intended for existing teachers with or without prior expo- 13 sure to computer science. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2028; provided, however, that 15 paragraphs g and h of subdivision 2 of section 819 of the education law 16 as added by section one of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed 17 on July 1, 2032. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 18 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 19 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 20 on or before such effective date.